California statutes. Education Code
If at any time during a fiscal year the county superintendent of schools concludes that the budget of any school district within his or her jurisdiction does not comply with the standards and criteria for fiscal stability developed pursuant to Section 33127 for that fiscal year, he or she shall notify the Superintendent of Public Instruction and the district in writing of that conclusion and may conduct a comprehensive review of the financial and budgetary conditions of the district. The superintendent shall report his or her findings and recommendations to the governing board of the district and the Superintendent of Public Instruction and may include recommendations of methods by which the budgeted expenditures for the balance of the fiscal year may be brought into balance with the revenue of the district. That report shall be made to the governing board at a public meeting of the governing board. The governing board shall, no later than 15 days after receipt of the report, notify the county superintendent of schools and the Superintendent of Public Instruction of its proposed actions on their recommendations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1462, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

42638.

(a) If the order is disapproved by the county superintendent of schools, it shall be returned to the governing board of the school district, except as otherwise provided in this code for the registration of warrants, with a statement of his or her reasons for disapproving the order.

(b) If the county superintendent determines that there is evidence that fraud or misappropriation of funds has occurred, the county superintendent shall notify the governing board of the school district, the State Controller, the Superintendent of Public Instruction, and the local district attorney.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 620, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

42639.

(a) The county auditor may examine each order and requisition on school district funds transmitted to the auditor by the county superintendent of schools. If the auditor allows the order and requisition, the auditor shall endorse thereon “examined and allowed,” and shall date, number, and sign it, whereupon it shall become a warrant on the county treasurer. The auditor shall detach any bill attached to the requisition, and shall number the bill, giving it the same number that the auditor gives the warrant, and file it in the auditor’s office. The auditor shall thereupon return the order, requisition, and warrant to the county superintendent of schools who shall transmit it to the governing board of the school district for issuance to the payee or to the payee’s order.

(b) A requisition of the county superintendent of schools, whether based upon written order of the governing board of a school district or authorized by law, shall constitute full authority for the signature for allowance of the requisition by the county auditor as a warrant on the county treasurer, and no other authority shall be necessary or required for such action by the county auditor.

(c) “Requisition,” as used in this section, includes any order or demand signed by the county superintendent of schools directing the county auditor to draw the auditor’s warrant on the county treasurer.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 666, Sec. 34.   (AB 486)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

42639.1.

The county auditor may authorize the destruction of any bill or supporting document received from a school district for purposes of Section 42639 if all of the following conditions are met:

(a) The record, paper, or document is photographed, microphotographed, or reproduced on film of a type approved for permanent photographic records by the National Institute of Standards and Technology.

(b) The device used to reproduce such record, paper, or document on film is one which accurately reproduces the original thereof in all details.

(c) The photographs, microphotographs, or other reproductions on film are placed in conveniently accessible files and provision is made for preserving, examining, and using the same.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 573, Sec. 73.   (SB 800)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

42640.

In lieu of drawing his warrant as provided in Section 42639, the county auditor may, with the approval of the governing board of the school district, endorse, date, and number the order and requisition and may prepare a separate warrant on the county treasurer for the same amount as the order and requisition. The warrant shall show that it had been drawn on the order of a school district naming the school district and shall show, the payee, date of issue, as well as other information deemed appropriate by the auditor.

The auditor shall draw such separate warrant by signing it and no other signature shall be required. Thereupon the auditor shall transmit the separate warrant to the county superintendent of schools who shall transmit it to the governing board of the school district for issuance to the payee or to his order, or with the approval of the governing board of the school district, shall transmit it to the payee.

The order and requisition may direct the transfer of the amount of the separate warrant from the funds of the district to a clearing fund in the county treasury (to be known as the schools commercial revolving fund), to the end that separate warrants for all districts may be drawn against a single revolving fund.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

42641.

The governing board of any school district may, with the approval of the county auditor and county treasurer, in lieu of issuing single orders for the payment of the salary or wages of each employee, issue payroll orders, on forms prescribed by the county superintendent of schools and approved by the Superintendent of Public Instruction, for the payment of the salaries or wages of two or more employees. Payroll orders may be drawn only for the payment of salaries and wages of employees, and shall constitute requisitions on the county auditor and warrants on the county treasurer when approved and signed by the county superintendent of schools and allowed and signed by the county auditor, respectively.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

42642.

Each payroll order drawn pursuant to this article shall be drawn, approved, and issued in the same manner and shall contain the same minimum content as prescribed for single orders. Each payroll order shall list the names of all employees in whose favor the order is drawn and shall state the amount of money due each.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

42643.

The superintendent of schools of each county shall keep, open to the inspection of the public, a register of warrants, showing the fund upon which the requisitions have been drawn, the number, in whose favor, and for what purpose they were drawn.

The county superintendent shall prescribe rules for school districts he determines to be fiscally accountable, pursuant to Section 42650, that retain copies of warrants and supporting documents within the district files.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 36.)
-------------------------------------------

42644.

Orders for the payment of wages and payroll orders for the payment of wages of employees employed full time in positions not requiring certification qualifications shall be drawn twice during each calendar month on days designated in advance by the governing board of each school district to which this section is made applicable. Labor performed between the 1st and 15th days, inclusive, of any calendar month shall be paid for between the 16th and 26th day of the month during which the labor was performed, and labor performed between the 16th and the last day inclusive, of any calendar month, shall be paid for between the 1st and 10th day of the following month.

The governing board of each school district which has an average daily attendance of 5,000 or more, and the governing board of each school district with an average daily attendance of less than 5,000 in a county with a population in excess of 4,000,000 persons as determined by the 1960 federal census, shall make the provisions of this section applicable to the board, whenever a majority of the employees of the district employed full time in positions not requiring certification qualifications petition the board in writing to do so.

The governing board of a school district which has an average daily attendance of less than 5,000, other than such a school district situated in a county with a population in excess of 4,000,000 persons as determined by the 1960 federal census, may, on the petition in writing of a majority of the employees of the district employed full time in positions not requiring certification qualifications, make the provisions of this section applicable to the board.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

42645.

In any unified school district with 100,000 or more average daily attendance as an alternative to the payment procedures prescribed by Section 42644, orders for the payment of wages, and payroll orders for the payment of wages and warrants for the payment of wages of employees employed full time in positions not requiring certification qualifications shall be drawn once each two weeks, twice a month, or once each four weeks on days designated in advance by the governing board of the district. Labor performed during each such payroll period shall be paid for not later than the eighth working day of the following payroll period.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

42646.

In any county, the county superintendent of schools, with the approval of the Superintendent of Public Instruction, the county board of education, and the county auditor, may prescribe a payroll procedure, to be followed by designated districts in the county, under which the school district governing boards, by use of payroll orders, shall authorize and direct the county superintendent of schools and the county auditor to draw separate payroll warrants in the names of the individual district employees for the respective amounts set forth therein to the end that each employee may be furnished with a statement of the amount earned and an itemization of the amounts withheld therefrom under requirements of the law or by direction of the employee.

The payroll warrants shall show the closing date of the pay period for which issued and the date of issue and a statement that it is drawn by order of the governing board of the district and shall bear the signature of the county auditor. 

To obtain the advantage of a uniform pay period and pay date within school districts, the payroll procedure may specify the ending date of the pay period and, notwithstanding Sections 42644, 45040, and 45048, the date of issue for payroll warrants, except that the issue date shall be on or before the 10th calendar day following the end of the pay period. The payroll procedure may provide for salary payments, including salary advances, more frequently than once a month.

The payroll procedure may provide for payroll orders authorizing salary payments to individual employees on a continuing basis until notifications of changes or adjustments are submitted by the school districts, provided that an itemized listing of payments made under this procedure is furnished to the school district on or before the date of issue of the payroll warrants.

The payroll order may direct the transfer from the districts’ funds to a clearing fund in the county treasury, to be known as the schools payroll revolving fund, of the total of the amount of the payroll warrants to be issued under the order to the end that payroll warrants for all districts may be drawn against a single revolving fund. The payroll order may further direct the transfer from the districts’ funds of the totals of the various deductions set forth therein to the trust funds in the county treasury entitled to receive credit for them and may further direct the proper disbursement of such trust amounts.

When the payroll procedure provides for payment of salary once each month the payment shall be made on the last working day of the month as required by Section 45166.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1452, Sec. 355.)
-------------------------------------------

42646.3.

A payroll clearance fund, for the purpose of consolidating and balancing payroll deductions and other payroll accounting purposes for one or more school district employees whose salary is paid from one or more funds, may be established by the governing board of the school district or, if the district operates under the payroll procedures set forth in Section 42646, by the county superintendent of schools.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 586, Sec. 6.)
-------------------------------------------

42647.

With the approval of the Superintendent of Public Instruction, the governing board of a unified school district, or district with over 10,000 average daily attendance, may cause to be drawn all warrants on the county treasurer against all the funds, except debt service, of the district in the county treasury in the payment of the expenses of the district. The warrants shall be issued by a person designated as the district auditor or district disbursing officer for the school district on the county treasurer in favor of the persons entitled thereto in payment of all claims chargeable against the district which have been legally examined, allowed, and ordered paid by the governing board. The district auditor shall issue warrants on the county treasurer for all debts and demands against the district when the amounts are fixed by law. The form of the warrant shall be as prescribed by the governing board and approved by the county auditor or county treasurer having jurisdiction.

Notwithstanding Section 42631, the cost of printing the warrants shall be borne by the district.

No county officer shall be responsible for producing reports, statements, and other data relating to or based on these payments of the expenses of the districts. Those districts issuing warrants as provided by this section shall provide the county superintendent of schools, in the form prescribed by him or her, with the data necessary to make retirement reports and other reports required of him or her by law. All warrants, vouchers, and supporting documents shall be kept by the school districts that draw their own warrants.

Notwithstanding Section 27005 of the Government Code, or any other section requiring orders for warrants or warrants to be signed by the county superintendent of schools or the county auditor, or both, the county treasurer shall pay the warrant, if money is available.

Notwithstanding Section 41000, except for assessing and tax collecting, the county auditor and the county treasurer may charge those districts that draw their own warrants for the cost of all fiscal services.

The person authorized by the governing board of the district to issue warrants pursuant to this section shall execute an official bond in an amount fixed by the governing board conditioned upon the faithful performance of his or her duties under this section. A county superintendent of schools or a county auditor shall not be liable under the terms of their bonds or otherwise for any warrant issued pursuant to this section. It is not intended that this provision shall be applied so as to impair the obligation of any contract in the bond of the officer in effect on the effective date of this section.

A listing of the warrants issued under this section by each school district shall be forwarded to the county auditor having jurisdiction, upon his or her request, and to the county superintendent of schools having jurisdiction over the district on the same day warrants are issued. The listing, which may be magnetic tape, punched cards, or in other form, shall report, among other things, the warrant number, date of the warrant, amount of the warrant, the name of the payee, and the fund on which the warrant is drawn.

The form and content of the warrant listing shall be as prescribed by the governing board and approved by the county auditor having jurisdiction.

Each unified school district or district with over 10,000 average daily attendance that issues warrants pursuant to this section shall furnish monthly to the county superintendent of schools and the county auditor of the county of jurisdiction, upon his or her request, a statement showing for the current fiscal year to date, for each required expenditure classification, the amount budgeted, actual expenditures, encumbrances and unencumbered balances.

In order to obtain the approval of the Superintendent of Public Instruction, a unified school district, or district with over 10,000 average daily attendance, shall file a written application with the county superintendent of schools of jurisdiction. Upon receipt of an application from the district, the county superintendent of schools shall cause a survey to be made of the district’s accounting controls by an independent certified public accountant or public accountant in accordance with standards prescribed by the Controller. The certified public accountant or public accountant shall report his or her findings and recommendations to the county superintendent, county auditor, and to the applicant district.

The county superintendent shall forward the district’s application, together with his or her other recommendations and the recommendations of the county auditor and a report of the survey, to the Superintendent of Public Instruction for approval or disapproval of the application. The Superintendent of Public Instruction shall approve the application only if he or she finds that the accounting controls of the district are adequate. If the Superintendent of Public Instruction determines that these controls are inadequate, he or she shall disapprove the application.

The county superintendent of schools shall be reimbursed for all costs incident to the accounting controls survey made pursuant to the district’s application from the district’s funds.

When approved by the Superintendent of Public Instruction, the issuance of warrants pursuant to this section shall be effective at the beginning of the fiscal year if the approval had been made prior to the preceding first day in January. If the issuance of warrants has been disapproved, the Superintendent of Public Instruction and the county superintendent of schools shall state the specific steps that must be taken by the school district in order to receive approval. If at any time the county superintendent of schools determines that the accounting controls of the district have become inadequate, he or she may recommend to the Superintendent of Public Instruction that the approval be revoked, to be effective on the first day of the following fiscal year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 530, Sec. 16.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

42648.

The provisions of Article 3 (commencing with Section 29850) of Chapter 5 of Division 3 of Title 3 of the Government Code shall be applicable to any unified school district, or district with over 10,000 average daily attendance authorized to issue warrants pursuant to Section 42647; except that whenever any reference is made in said Article 3 to (1) the county auditor, or (2) the general fund of the county, such reference shall be deemed, for purposes of this section, to be to (1) the person authorized to issue warrants pursuant to Section 42647, and (2) the general fund of the school district, respectively.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

42649.5.

In a county in which the board of supervisors has transferred educational functions to the county board of education pursuant to Section 1080, and a single budget has been authorized for the purposes of the county school service fund, county board of education, county committee on school district organization, and the office of the county superintendent of schools pursuant to Sections 1620 to 1625, inclusive, the duties of the county auditor specified in this article shall be performed by the county superintendent of schools.

A listing of all warrants approved and allowed by the county superintendent of schools pursuant to this section shall be forwarded to the county auditor on the same day the warrants are forwarded to the school district or the payee. The form of the warrant and the form and content of the warrant listing shall be as prescribed by the county auditor.

Notwithstanding Section 27005 of the Government Code, or any other section requiring orders for warrants or warrants to be signed by the county auditor, the county treasurer in counties subject to this section shall pay warrants which are signed by the county superintendent of schools, and the county auditor shall not be liable under his bond or otherwise for a warrant issued pursuant to this section.

This section shall apply only in those counties in which the county board of supervisors has adopted its provisions by resolution.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 42649 (as added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 533) by Stats. 1981, Ch. 714, Sec. 90.)
-------------------------------------------

42650.

With the approval of the county superintendent of schools, the governing board of a school district may cause warrants to be drawn on the county treasury against designated funds, except debt service, of the district in the county treasury in the payment of expenses of the district. The warrants for salary and other types of claims designated by the county superintendent shall be issued by a person designated as the district disbursing officer for the school district on the county treasury in favor of the persons entitled thereto in payment of all claims in designated categories chargeable against the district which have been legally examined, allowed, and ordered paid by the governing board. The district disbursing officer shall issue warrants, using procedures prescribed by the county auditor, on the county treasury for all debts and demands, within categories designated by the county superintendent, against the district when amounts are legally approved. The form of the warrant shall be prescribed by, and approved by, the county auditor or county treasurer having jurisdiction.

The cost of printing warrants may be charged to the district. Notwithstanding Section 41000, except for assessing and tax collecting, the county auditor and county treasurer may charge those districts that draw their own warrants for the cost of all fiscal services.

Notwithstanding Section 27005 of the Government Code, or any other provision of law requiring orders for warrants or warrants to be signed by the county superintendent of schools or the county auditor, or both, the county superintendent and county auditor may prescribe alternative procedures for districts to issue warrants. The district disbursing officer shall not be considered a deputy county superintendent of schools or a deputy county auditor. The county treasurer shall pay the warrant in the designated category, if district funds are available.

County officers shall not be responsible for providing reports, statements, or other data relating to, or based on, the designated payments of expenses of the district. Those districts issuing warrants, as provided by this section, shall provide the county superintendent of schools, in the form prescribed by him, with the data necessary to make retirement reports and other reports required of him by law. All warrants, vouchers, and supporting documents shall be kept by school districts that draw their own warrants in those designated categories.

The county superintendent shall provide for a periodic review of the districts’ financial transactions and internal control pursuant to Section 1241.5.

County superintendents of schools may provide fiscal, budgetary, and data-processing services through contractual agreements to school districts that have been determined to be fiscally accountable under the provisions of this section.

The person authorized by the governing board of the district to issue warrants, pursuant to this section, shall execute an official bond in an amount fixed by the governing board conditioned upon the faithful performance of his duties under this section. A county superintendent or county auditor shall not be liable under the terms of their bonds or otherwise for any warrant issued pursuant to this section. This section shall not be construed as impairing the obligation of any contract in the bond of such officer in effect on January 1, 1977.

A listing of the warrants issued under this section by each school district shall be forwarded to the county auditor having jurisdiction, upon his request, and to the county superintendent of schools having jurisdiction over the district on the same day warrants are issued. The listing, which may be on magnetic tape, punched cards, or in other form, shall report, among other things, the warrant number, date of the warrant, amount of the warrant, the name of the payee, and the fund on which drawn. The form and content of the warrant listing shall be as prescribed by the county auditor or county superintendent and approved by the county auditor or county superintendent having jurisdiction.

Each district which issues warrants pursuant to this section shall furnish monthly to the county superintendent of schools and the county auditor of the county of jurisdiction, upon his request, a statement showing for the current fiscal year to date, for each required expenditure classification, the amount budgeted, actual expenditures, encumbrances and unencumbered balances.

In order to obtain the approval of the county superintendent of schools and county auditor for fiscally accountable status, the governing board of a school district shall file a written application with the county superintendent of schools and county auditor having jurisdiction on forms which the county superintendent shall prescribe. Upon receipt of an application from the district, the county superintendent shall cause an audit to be made of the district’s management and accounting controls, in accordance with standards prescribed by him, by an independent certified public accountant or public accountant approved by the county superintendent, who shall report his findings and recommendations to the county superintendent and to the applicant district. The audit report may include Department of Finance guidelines and other assessments of fiscal management as required by the county superintendent or the audit may be the report of the annual district audit pursuant to Section 41020 if that is acceptable to the county superintendent of schools. The cost of the audit required in support of a district’s application for fiscal accountability shall be borne by the applicant district.

The county superintendent and county auditor shall review the district’s application and report of financial management and control and may approve the application if they find the management and accounting controls of the district to be adequate. If the county superintendent and county auditor determine that such management and accounting controls are inadequate, they shall disapprove the application.

A district that applies for fiscal accountability status shall file its written application with the county superintendent of schools on or before September 1. The required audit of financial management and accounting controls shall be filed on or before January 1. When a district’s application for fiscal accountability status has been approved by the county superintendent of schools and county auditor, the issuance of warrants by the district pursuant to this section shall be effective at the beginning of a fiscal year, provided that approval had been made prior to the preceding first day in March. If disapproved, the county superintendent of schools shall state the specific steps which must be taken by the applicant school district to receive approval and these changes shall be certified as completed by an independent certified public accountant or public accountant before the county superintendent shall approve the application. If at any time the county superintendent of schools or the county auditor determines that the financial management or accounting controls of the district have become inadequate, either such officer may revoke approval for fiscal accountability status effective immediately.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 734, Sec. 23.   Effective October 11, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

42651.

(a) The governing board of a school district may authorize a bank, savings and loan association, or credit union in which school district deferred compensation funds are invested pursuant to Section 53609 of the Government Code, to disburse benefits to eligible school district employees or retired employees, or their beneficiaries, provided the following conditions are met:

(1) No payment shall be made to any person by the bank, savings and loan association, or credit union unless authorized in writing by the school district.

(2) Written authorization from a school district to a bank, savings and loan association, or credit union to make a payment shall include the name of each person to receive payment and the amount each person is to receive.

(3) The written authorization shall be signed by a majority of the members of the governing board of the district or by a person or persons authorized by the governing board to sign the authorization, so long as such person or persons is an officer or an employee of the district.

(b) The bank, savings and loan association, or credit union authorized to disburse funds pursuant to this section shall be considered an agent of the school district for the purposes of this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 92, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

42652.

(a) The approval of a school district to draw all warrants on the county treasury pursuant to Section 42647 may be revoked or suspended by the Superintendent of Public Instruction for any school district that has a qualified or negative certification pursuant to Section 42131.

(b) The approval of a school district to draw warrants on the county treasury pursuant to Section 42650 may be revoked or suspended by the county superintendent of schools for any school district that has a qualified or negative certification pursuant to Section 42131.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 924, Sec. 16.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Void Warrants [42661. - 42662.]

42661.

Any warrant drawn on the funds of a district retirement system and issued to the claimant thereof but not presented for payment to the county treasurer within two years after it was issued is void and the proceeds of such warrants shall revert to and become a part of the contributions of the district and shall be applied to reduce the cost to the taxpayers of the district maintaining the retirement system. The county auditor shall each month inform the county superintendent of schools of warrants which have become void during the preceding month, and the county superintendent of schools shall transmit such information to the governing board of the school district.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

42662.

The county superintendent of schools shall keep a record of all orders, or warrants which have become void.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Orders and Warrants When Moneys Are Not Available [42670. - 42678.]

42670.

When any order against the funds of a school district is presented to the county superintendent of schools, and the order constitutes a valid claim against the funds of the district, and moneys are not available in the funds of the district from which to pay the order, he shall endorse on the order the words “Not approved for want of funds” and shall register the order in the records of his office.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

42671.

The county superintendent of schools shall number and date the registered order and shall transmit the registered order to the governing board of the school district which drew the order, and it shall deliver the registered order to the payee or his order. From the date of registration the registered order shall bear interest at the rate of 5 percent per annum until the date upon which notice is given, pursuant to this article, that the county superintendent of schools is ready to approve the registered order.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

42672.

Whenever moneys are available for the payment of the registered order the county superintendent of schools shall give notice, in a newspaper published in the county, or if there is no newspaper, by written notice posted at the courthouse, stating that he is ready to approve the order. The notice may list any number of registered orders of one or more districts for the payment of which moneys are available, giving the name or names of the district or districts and listing the registered orders in the order of registration for each district.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

42673.

At the time of giving the notice the county superintendent of schools shall set aside in the funds of each district for a period of 60 days the amount necessary for the payment of the registered orders of the district listed in the notice. If any registered order is not presented to the county superintendent of schools for payment within 60 days after the notice has been given, and moneys are not available to pay the registered order at the time of presentation, it shall not be approved until money becomes available for that purpose and notice is again given that the county superintendent of schools is ready to pay it.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

42674.

The county superintendent of schools shall approve the registered orders of each district, and sign them as requisitions on the county auditor, in the order of their presentation. He shall enter on each the amount of interest due and the total amount, including principal and interest, payable. Each approved registered order shall thereupon be governed by the procedure established in this code relative to payments from school district funds.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

42675.

As an alternative to the method provided in Section 42674, when any corporation, firm, or person presents two or more registered orders for payment at the same time, registered on the same date, and issued against the funds of the same district, the registered orders may be approved, allowed, and consecutively numbered by the county superintendent of schools and the county auditor as requisitions and warrants on the funds of the district, and a special interest requisition may be issued by the county superintendent of schools against the funds of the district for the total amount of the interest payable on the registered orders.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

42676.

The special interest requisition shall bear upon its face substantially the following notation: “In full payment of interest due on warrants numbered __ to __, inclusive, of the ____ School District.”

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

42677.

The special interest requisition shall be numbered by the county superintendent of schools and county auditor, being given the number immediately succeeding the number assigned to the last of the requisitions and warrants referred to in Section 42675.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

42678.

The county superintendent of schools shall report to the county treasurer and the county auditor within 10 days after the end of each month the amount of the interest computed pursuant to this article. The report shall show each district for which interest has been computed, the numbers of the registered orders for which the interest is to be paid, and the total amount of the interest charged to each district. He shall also, upon transmitting to the governing board of any school district registered orders which have been approved and allowed as warrants against the funds of the district, report in writing to the clerk or secretary of the district the amount of interest computed on the registered orders and the numbers of the registered orders for which the interest is to be paid.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Optional Method—Registering Warrants [42690. - 42694.]

42690.

In lieu of the method provided in Article 6 (commencing with Section 42670) of this chapter for the registration of school district orders, the provisions of this article may be followed upon resolution adopted by the county board of supervisors of any county.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

42691.

When any order on school district funds is received by the county superintendent of schools and there is insufficient money in the fund or funds against which the order is drawn to pay the order in full, the county superintendent shall endorse on the order “to be registered for lack of sufficient funds,” sign, date, and number it as a requisition on the county auditor, and transmit the requisition to the county auditor. The county auditor shall endorse on the order “examined and allowed,” sign, date, and number it as a warrant on the county treasurer, and return the warrant to the county superintendent of schools who shall transmit it to the governing board of the school district for issuance to the payee or to his order.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

42692.

When the warrant is presented to the county treasurer for payment, he shall endorse, register, advertise, and pay it, with interest at the rate of 5 percent per annum, in the manner prescribed, as nearly as may be, for county warrants in Sections 29821 to 29824, inclusive, and Sections 29826 and 29827 of the Government Code.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

42693.

If the warrants are not again presented for payment within 60 days from the time the notice provided for in Section 29823 of the Government Code is given, the fund set aside for the payment of the warrants shall be applied by the treasurer to the payment of unpaid warrants next in order of registry.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

42694.
